Arkansas, session 2025, SB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-130. Funding of Arkansas Center for Health Improvement by state
moneys prohibited — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "state agency" means every department,
division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state, including
state-supported institutions of higher education and state-supported medical
facilities.
(b)(1) No state moneys shall be used by a state agency to provide
funding or grants or to enter into a contract with the Arkansas Center for
Health Improvement.
(2) A state agency that provides funding or grants or enters
into a contract with the Arkansas Center for Health Improvement shall execute
a written certification that no state moneys are being used for the funding,
grant, or contract.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Application.
(a) This act does not apply to a contract using state moneys entered
*LGL047*
01/29/2025 8:09:02 AM LGL047

SB141
into before the effective date of this act.
(b) A contract under subsection (a) of this section shall not be
renewed using state moneys.

































01/29/2025 8:09:02 AM LGL047